Washington statutes.
RCW 7.105.460

Enforcement and penalties—Extreme risk protection orders—False petitions.

(1) Any person who files a petition for an extreme risk protection order knowing the information in such petition to be materially false, or with the intent to harass the respondent, is guilty of a gross misdemeanor.

(2)(a) Except as provided in (b) of this subsection, any person who has in his or her custody or control, accesses, purchases, possesses, or receives, or attempts to purchase or receive, a firearm with knowledge that he or she is prohibited from doing so by an extreme risk protection order is guilty of a gross misdemeanor, and further is prohibited from having in his or her custody or control, accessing, purchasing, possessing, or receiving, or attempting to purchase or receive, a firearm for a period of five years from the date the existing order expires.

(b) A person is guilty of a class C felony for a violation under (a) of this subsection if the person has two or more previous convictions for violating an order issued under this chapter.

[ 2022 c 268 s 22; 2021 c 215 s 58.]

NOTES:

Effective dates—2022 c 268: See note following RCW 7.105.010.

Effective date—2022 c 268; 2021 c 215: See note following RCW 7.105.900.